Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1041.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 446 of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 446. Breweries.--* * *123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627 (d) (1) A single entity may hold and operate a brewery license and a limited distillery license at the same location and may manufacture liquor and malt or brewed beverages at that location. The area subject to each license shall be clearly delineated and may overlap.(2) Only the location used for manufacturing liquor and malt or brewed beverages may be dual-licensed.(3) Each license may only operate during the hours that it is permitted to under this act.(4) A citation which may be issued for activity relating to the operation of the location may be issued against one or both of the licenses.(5) A licensee that operates a brewery license and a limited distillery license as provided under this subsection and which allows the consumption of alcohol on-premise shall consider the location a single entity for purposes of the ratios provided under subsection (a)(2).Section 2. Section 505.4(b) of the act is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 505.4. Limited Distilleries and Distilleries.--* * *(b) * * *(10) (i) A single entity may hold and operate a brewery license and a limited distillery license at the same location and may manufacture liquor and malt or brewed beverages at that location. The area subject to each license shall be clearly delineated and may overlap.(ii) Only the location used for manufacturing liquor and malt or brewed beverages may be dual-licensed.(iii) Each license may only operate during the hours that it is permitted to under this act.20250HB1041PN1130 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) A citation which may be issued for activity relating to the operation of the location may be issued against one or both of the licenses.(v) A licensee that operates a brewery license and a limited distillery license as provided under this paragraph and allows the consumption of alcohol on-premise shall consider the location a single entity for purposes of the ratios provided under this section.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1041PN1130 - 3 - 12345678910